Florida, session 2026, SB756.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 26 125.01055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 27 125.01055âAffordable housing.â 28 (7)(a)âA county must authorize multifamily and mixed-use 29 residential as allowable uses in any area zoned for commercial, 30 industrial, or mixed use, and in portions of any flexibly zoned 31 area such as a planned unit development permitted for 32 commercial, industrial, or mixed use, if at least 40 percent of 33 the residential units in a proposed multifamily development are 34 rental units that, for a period of at least 50 30 years, are 35 affordable as defined in s. 420.0004. Notwithstanding any other 36 law, local ordinance, or regulation to the contrary, a county 37 may not require a proposed multifamily development to obtain a 38 zoning or land use change, special exception, conditional use 39 approval, variance, transfer of density or development units, 40 amendment to a development of regional impact, or comprehensive 41 plan amendment for the building height, zoning, and densities 42 authorized under this subsection. For mixed-use residential 43 projects, at least 65 percent of the total square footage must 44 be used for residential purposes. The county may not require 45 that more than 10 percent of the total square footage of such 46 mixed-use residential projects be used for nonresidential 47 purposes. 48 Section 2.âSubsection (4) and paragraph (a) of subsection 49 (7) of section 166.04151, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 50 166.04151âAffordable housing.â 51 (4)âIn exchange for a developer fulfilling the requirements 52 of subsection (2) or, for residential or mixed-use residential 53 development, the requirements of subsection (3), a municipality 54 must provide incentives to fully offset all costs to the 55 developer of its affordable housing contribution or linkage fee. 56 Such incentives may include, but are not limited to: 57 (a)âAllowing the developer density or intensity bonus 58 incentives or more floor space than allowed under the current or 59 proposed future land use designation or zoning; 60 (b)âReducing or waiving fees, such as impact fees or water 61 and sewer charges; or 62 (c)âGranting other incentives. 63 64 Any incentives provided under this subsection must be used for 65 the construction of affordable housing. 66 (7)(a)âA municipality must authorize multifamily and mixed 67 use residential as allowable uses in any area zoned for 68 commercial, industrial, or mixed use, and in portions of any 69 flexibly zoned area such as a planned unit development permitted 70 for commercial, industrial, or mixed use, if at least 40 percent 71 of the residential units in a proposed multifamily development 72 are rental units that, for a period of at least 50 30 years, are 73 affordable as defined in s. 420.0004. Notwithstanding any other 74 law, local ordinance, or regulation to the contrary, a 75 municipality may not require a proposed multifamily development 76 to obtain a zoning or land use change, special exception, 77 conditional use approval, variance, transfer of density or 78 development units, amendment to a development of regional 79 impact, amendment to a municipal charter, or comprehensive plan 80 amendment for the building height, zoning, and densities 81 authorized under this subsection. For mixed-use residential 82 projects, at least 65 percent of the total square footage must 83 be used for residential purposes. The municipality may not 84 require that more than 10 percent of the total square footage of 85 such mixed-use residential projects be used for nonresidential 86 purposes. 87 Section 3.âParagraphs (d) and (o) of subsection (3) of 88 section 196.1978, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 89 196.1978âAffordable housing property exemption.â 90 (3) 91 (d)1.âThe property appraiser shall exempt: 92 a.âSeventy-five percent of the assessed value of the units 93 in multifamily projects that meet the requirements of this 94 subsection and are used to house natural persons or families 95 whose annual household income is greater than 80 percent but not 96 more than 100 120 percent of the median annual adjusted gross 97 income for households within the metropolitan statistical area 98 or, if not within a metropolitan statistical area, within the 99 county in which the person or family resides; and 100 b.âFrom ad valorem property taxes the units in multifamily 101 projects that meet the requirements of this subsection and are 102 used to house natural persons or families whose annual household 103 income does not exceed 80 percent of the median annual adjusted 104 gross income for households within the metropolitan statistical 105 area or, if not within a metropolitan statistical area, within 106 the county in which the person or family resides. 107 2.âWhen determining the value of a unit for purposes of 108 applying an exemption pursuant to this paragraph, the property 109 appraiser must include in such valuation the proportionate share 110 of the residential common areas, including the land, fairly 111 attributable to such unit. 112 (o)1.âBeginning with the 2025 tax roll, a taxing authority 113 may elect, upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution approved 114 by a two-thirds vote of the governing body, not to exempt 115 property under sub-subparagraph (d)1.a. located in a county 116 specified pursuant to subparagraph 2., subject to the conditions 117 of this paragraph. 118 2.âA taxing authority must make a finding in the ordinance 119 or resolution that the most recently published Shimberg Center 120 for Housing Studies Annual Report, prepared pursuant to s. 121 420.6075, identifies that a county that is part of the 122 jurisdiction of the taxing authority is within a metropolitan 123 statistical area or region where the number of affordable and 124 available units in the metropolitan statistical area or region 125 is greater than the number of renter households in the 126 metropolitan statistical area or region for the category 127 entitled â0-100 120 percent AMI.â 128 3.âAn election made pursuant to this paragraph may apply 129 only to the ad valorem property tax levies imposed within a 130 county specified pursuant to subparagraph 2. by the taxing 131 authority making the election. 132 4.âThe ordinance or resolution must take effect on the 133 January 1 immediately succeeding adoption and shall expire on 134 the second January 1 after the January 1 in which the ordinance 135 or resolution takes effect. The ordinance or resolution may be 136 renewed prior to its expiration pursuant to this paragraph. 137 5.âThe taxing authority proposing to make an election under 138 this paragraph must advertise the ordinance or resolution or 139 renewal thereof pursuant to the requirements of s. 50.011(1) 140 prior to adoption. 141 6.âThe taxing authority must provide to the property 142 appraiser the adopted ordinance or resolution or renewal thereof 143 by the effective date of the ordinance or resolution or renewal 144 thereof. 145 7.âNotwithstanding an ordinance or resolution or renewal 146 thereof adopted pursuant to this paragraph, property in a 147 multifamily project that received an exemption pursuant to sub 148 subparagraph (d)1.a. before the adoption or renewal of such 149 ordinance or resolution may continue to receive such exemption 150 for each subsequent consecutive year that the same owner or each 151 successive owner applies for and is granted the exemption. 152 Section 4.âPresent subsections (9), (10), and (11) of 153 section 201.02, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 154 subsections (10), (11), and (12), respectively, and a new 155 subsection (9) is added to that section, to read: 156 201.02âTax on deeds and other instruments relating to real 157 property or interests in real property.â 158 (9)âTaxes imposed by this section do not apply to a deed, 159 transfer, or conveyance that transfers or conveys residential 160 property to a first-time homebuyer for use as a principal 161 residence. For purposes of this subsection, the term âfirst-time 162 homebuyerâ means a person who has not held ownership interest in 163 a principal residence during the 3-year period before the date 164 of purchase of the principal residence and who is a moderate 165 income person as defined in s. 420.602. 166 Section 5.âSubsection (10) is added to section 201.08, 167 Florida Statutes, to read: 168 201.08âTax on promissory or nonnegotiable notes, written 169 obligations to pay money, or assignments of wages or other 170 compensation; exception.â 171 (10)âTaxes imposed by this section do not apply to 172 documents described in subsection (1) that are executed by a 173 first-time homebuyer in connection with the purchase of a 174 principal residence. For purposes of this subsection, the term 175 âfirst-time homebuyerâ means a person who has not held ownership 176 interest in a principal residence during the 3-year period 177 before the date of purchase of the principal residence and who 178 is a moderate-income person as defined in s. 420.602. 179 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.